Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB4664.
peoplE of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 676b. (1) Subject to subsection (2), a person, an individual, without authority, shall not block, obstruct, impede, or otherwise interfere with the normal flow of vehicular, streetcar, or pedestrian traffic upon on a public street or highway in this state, by means of a barricade, object, or device, or with his or her the individual's person. This section does not apply to persons individuals maintaining, rearranging, or constructing public utility or streetcar facilities in or adjacent to a street or highway. (2) Subsection (1) and any provision of the Michigan Administrative Code that prohibits a person an individual from standing in a roadway other than a limited access highway for the purpose of soliciting a ride, employment, or business from the occupant of any vehicle do not apply to a person an individual who is soliciting contributions on behalf of a charitable or civic organization during daylight hours, if all of the following are satisfied: (a) The charitable or civic organization complies with applicable local government regulations. A local government may enact or enforce regulations restricting, but not prohibiting, the activity described in this subsection. (b) The charitable or civic organization maintains at least not less than $500,000.00 in liability insurance. (c) The person individual is 18 years of age or older. (d) The person individual is wearing high-visibility safety apparel that meets current American standards promulgated by the International Safety Equipment Association. (e) The portion of the roadway upon on which the solicitation occurs is not a work zone and is within an intersection where traffic control devices are present. (f) The solicitation does not block, delay, or otherwise interfere with the movement of a streetcar on a streetcar track. (3) A local government or road authority that has jurisdiction over a roadway upon on which solicitation occurs as described in subsection (2) is not liable for any claim for damages arising out of the use of the roadway as described in subsection (2). (4) A person Except as otherwise provided in subsection (5), an individual who violates this section is responsible for a civil infraction. (5) An individual who violates this section while participating in an assembly on a highway in this state is guilty of a misdemeanor punishable by imprisonment for not more than 93 days, a fine of not more than $5,000.00, or both. (6) (5) A local government that, on July 27, 2017, has enacted or is enforcing regulations that are prohibited under subsection (2)(a) shall bring those regulations into compliance with subsection (2)(a) no later than September 25, 2017. (7) (6) As used in this section, "charitable or civic organization" means a nonprofit organization that is qualified under section 501(c)(3), 501(c)(4), 501(c)(7), 501(c)(8), or 501(c)(10) of the internal revenue code of 1986, 26 USC 501, or a veterans' organization that has tax-exempt status under the internal revenue code.